District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.06

Information regarding financial responsibility to be furnished person injured.

The Mayor shall furnish to any person who may be injured in person or property by any motor vehicle, upon written request, a statement that the owner or operator of any motor vehicle has furnished evidence of his ability to respond in damages in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and if such owner or operator shall have furnished evidence of having had in effect at the time of such injury or damage a motor vehicle liability policy, the name and address of the insurance carrier writing such policy. The Mayor shall collect for each abstract the sum of $7.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 122, ch. 222, § 6
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 103(b), 54 DCR 903
1981 Ed., § 40-406.
1973 Ed., § 40-422.
D.C. Law 16-279 increased the abstract fee from $2 to $7.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.